Alaska statutes. Title 28. Motor Vehicles.
Article 1. Registration.

Sec. 28.10.010.
Administration. [Repealed, § 7 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.10.011.
Vehicles subject to registration.

Every vehicle driven, moved, or parked upon a highway or other public parking place in the state shall be registered under this chapter except when the vehicle is

driven or moved on a highway only for the purpose of crossing the highway from one private property to another, including an implement of husbandry as defined by regulation;

driven or moved on a highway under a dealer’s plate or temporary permit as provided for in AS

28.10.031

and

28.10.181(j)

;

special mobile equipment as defined by regulation;

owned by the United States;

moved by human or animal power;

exempt under 50 U.S.C. App. 501-591 (Soldiers’ and Sailors’ Civil Relief Act);

driven or parked only on private property;

the vehicle of a nonresident as provided under AS

28.10.121

;

transported under a special permit under AS

28.10.151

;

being driven or moved on a highway, vehicular way, or a public parking place in the state that is not connected by a land highway or vehicular way to

the land-connected state highway system; or

a highway or vehicular way with an average daily traffic volume greater than 499;

an implement of husbandry operated in accordance with the provisions of AS

19.10.065

;

an electric personal motor vehicle.

History.

(§ 7 ch 178 SLA 1978; am § 1 ch 54 SLA 1979; am § 1 ch 99 SLA 1983; am § 3 ch 60 SLA 1986; am § 3 ch 26 SLA 1987; am § 79 ch 63 SLA 1993; am § 21 ch 48 SLA 1998; am § 2 ch 142 SLA 2002)

Revisor’s notes. —

Former paragraphs (10), (11), and (13) were renumbered as paragraphs (9)-(11) in 1998 to reflect the 1993 repeal of former paragraph (12) and the 1998 repeal of former paragraph (9).

Administrative Code. —

For registration, title, and transfer, see 2 AAC 92, art. 1.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Paragraph (11) (now paragraph (10)) must be construed in the conjunctive.
In other words, vehicles that are driven on roadways removed from the main “land-connected” state highway road system must be registered and must have insurance unless, in addition, they are only driven on a road system consisting solely of lightly-travelled (less than 500 vehicles per day) roads. June 13, 1988, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 28.10.020.
Powers and duties. [Repealed, § 7 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.10.021.
Application for registration.

The owner of a vehicle subject to registration shall apply for registration under this chapter by properly completing the form prescribed by the commissioner under AS

28.05.041

. Before the issuance of a certificate of registration by the department, the owner shall

pay all registration fees and taxes required under this chapter and federal heavy vehicle use taxes required under 26 U.S.C. 4481 (Internal Revenue Code of 1954);

unless the owner qualifies as a self-insurer under AS

28.20.400

or is exempted from obtaining liability insurance under AS

28.22.011

, certify to the department the existence of a motor vehicle liability policy that complies with AS

28.22.011

for the vehicle being registered; in this paragraph, “certify” means to indicate by check-off on the vehicle registration form prescribed by the department the existence of a policy of insurance, if a policy is required at that time, and the intention to continue the policy or obtain a policy as required by this subsection; and

comply with other applicable statutes and regulations.

At the time of application for registration or renewal of registration, the department shall provide the applicant written information explaining the state’s financial responsibility law.

An employee of the department who processes an application for registration or renewal of registration, other than an application received by mail or an application for registration under AS

28.10.152

, shall ask the applicant orally whether the applicant wishes to execute an anatomical gift. The department shall make known to all applicants the procedure for executing an anatomical gift under AS 13.52 (Health Care Decisions Act) by displaying posters in the offices in which applications are taken, by providing a brochure or other written information to each person who applies in person or by mail, and, if requested, by providing oral advice. The department shall inform each applicant in writing that, if the applicant executes a gift under AS 13.52 and if the gift is made with the registration application, the department will transmit the information on the registration to a donor registry created under AS

13.50.110

. The department shall also direct the applicant to notify a procurement organization or the department under AS

13.50.140

if the registration is destroyed or mutilated or the gift is revoked under AS

13.52.183

. The department shall carry out the requirements of AS

13.50.100

—

13.50.190

.

History.

(§ 7 ch 178 SLA 1978; am §§ 4, 17 ch 70 SLA 1984; am § 35 ch 21 SLA 1985; am § 1 ch 58 SLA 1985; am § 8 ch 43 SLA 1988; am § 11 ch 108 SLA 1989; am § 19 ch 80 SLA 1997; am § 7 ch 48 SLA 1998; am § 5 ch 68 SLA 2004; am § 5 ch 83 SLA 2004; am § 32 ch 100 SLA 2008)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, in subsection (c), “AS 13.52” was substituted for “AS 13.50 or includes an anatomical gift in a living will under AS 18.12” and “AS

13.52.170

” was substituted for “AS 13.50.050” in order to reconcile chs. 68 and 83, SLA 2004.

Administrative Code. —

For registration, title, and transfer, see 2 AAC 92, art. 1.

Collateral references. —

7A Am. Jur. 2d, Automobiles and Highway Traffic, § 57.

60 C.J.S., Motor Vehicles, §§ 277-281.

Sec. 28.10.030.
Unregistered vehicles. [Repealed, § 7 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.10.031.
Temporary permits.

When application, accompanied by the proper fee and tax, has been made for the registration of a vehicle, the vehicle may be driven pending the issuance of a certificate of registration by displaying a temporary permit issued by the department.

A licensed vehicle dealer may issue to the purchaser of a vehicle sold by the dealer a temporary permit to drive the vehicle. A permit is effective for a period not to exceed 60 days. The commissioner shall adopt regulations governing the issuance of permits under this section.

A person may not operate a vehicle under an expired permit issued under this section.

History.

(§ 7 ch 178 SLA 1978; am § 3 ch 6 FSSLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For registration, title, and transfer, see 2 AAC 92, art. 1.

Sec. 28.10.040.
Registration. [Repealed, § 7 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.10.041.
Grounds for refusing registration.

The department may refuse to register a vehicle if

the application contains a false or fraudulent statement;

the applicant fails to furnish information required by the department;

the applicant is not entitled to the issuance of a certificate of title or registration under this chapter;

the vehicle is determined to be mechanically unsafe to be driven or moved on a highway, vehicular way or area, or other public property in the state;

the department has reasonable grounds to believe that the vehicle was stolen or fraudulently acquired or that the granting of registration would be a fraud against the rightful owner or other person having a valid lien on the vehicle;

the registration of the vehicle has been suspended or revoked for any reason under the laws of the state;

the required fees or taxes have not been paid;

the vehicle or applicant fails to comply with this chapter or regulations implementing this section;

the vehicle is without a certificate of inspection required under AS

19.10.310

;

except for a vehicle to be registered under AS

28.10.152

, the vehicle is subject to a state-approved emission inspection program adopted under AS

46.14.400

or

46.14.510

, and the vehicle does not meet the standards of that program;

the applicant fails to certify to the department the existence of a motor vehicle liability policy that complies with AS

28.22.101

for the vehicle being registered unless the owner of the vehicle qualifies as a self-insurer under AS

28.20.400

or is exempted from obtaining liability insurance under AS

28.22.011

;

the applicant is a commercial motor carrier prohibited from operating by a federal agency.

When the department refuses to register a vehicle, it shall immediately notify the applicant stating the reasons for the action and informing the applicant of the right to a hearing under AS

28.05.131

—

28.05.141

.

Except for a vehicle to be registered under AS

28.10.152

, the department shall refuse to register a vehicle subject to the federal heavy vehicle use tax required by 26 U.S.C. 4481 (Internal Revenue Code of 1954) if the applicant fails to furnish proof, in the form prescribed by the United States Secretary of the Treasury, that the tax has been paid.

The department shall refuse to register a vehicle if the applicant fails to register the vehicle using the applicant’s full first, middle, and last name or a business name.

History.

(§ 7 ch 178 SLA 1978; am § 36 ch 21 SLA 1985; am § 1 ch 56 SLA 1985; am § 2 ch 58 SLA 1985; am § 1 ch 104 SLA 1985; am § 14 ch 108 SLA 1989; am § 3 ch 74 SLA 1993; am E.O. No. 98 § 6 (1997); am §§ 8, 9 ch 48 SLA 1998; am § 7 ch 60 SLA 2002; am § 1 ch 97 SLA 2003; am § 1 ch 80 SLA 2014)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective July 11, 2014, in (a)(5), substituted “lien on” for “lien upon” near the end, added (a)(12), and made a related change.

Sec. 28.10.050.
Application. [Repealed, § 7 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.10.051.
Department may suspend or revoke registration.

The department may suspend or revoke the registration of a vehicle, the certificate of registration or registration plates for a vehicle, or a special permit when

the department determines that the registration or certificate, plate, or permit was fraudulently procured or erroneously issued;

the department determines that a registered vehicle is mechanically unsafe to be driven or moved on a highway, vehicular way or area, or other public property in this state and the vehicle has been seized or impounded under AS

28.05.091

;

a registered vehicle has been scrapped, dismantled, or destroyed beyond repair;

the department determines that a required fee or tax has not been paid and the fee or tax is not paid upon reasonable notice and demand;

a registration plate, permit, or certificate is knowingly displayed on a vehicle other than the vehicle for which issued;

the department determines that the owner of a vehicle has committed an offense under this chapter involving the registration or the certificate, plate, or permit to be suspended or revoked;

the vehicle has been reported to the department as stolen or unlawfully converted;

the department is otherwise required to do so under the laws of this state;

the department determines that the vehicle owner has violated the requirements of AS

28.10.146

or

28.10.147

;

the department determines that a repair to a commercial motor vehicle, ordered by the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities or the Department of Public Safety under regulations adopted under AS 19, was not completed after the owner or operator represented to the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities, the Department of Public Safety, or the Department of Administration that the repair had been completed;

the owner or operator of a commercial motor vehicle has placed a commercial motor vehicle back in service after it has been placed out of service by the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities or the Department of Public Safety without having it reinspected as required under regulations adopted under AS 19;

the owner or operator is a commercial motor carrier prohibited from operating by a federal agency; or

the commercial motor vehicle is subject to an out-of-service order issued by a state or federal agency.

Unless the owner qualifies as a self-insurer under AS

28.20.400

, or is exempted from obtaining liability insurance under AS

28.22.011

, the department may suspend or revoke the registration of a vehicle that is not insured by a motor vehicle liability policy that complies with AS

28.22.101

.

History.

(§ 7 ch 178 SLA 1978; am § 4 ch 60 SLA 1986; am § 16 ch 108 SLA 1989; am § 2 ch 20 SLA 1990; am § 4 ch 6 FSSLA 1996; am E.O. No. 99 § 41 (1997); am § 2 ch 80 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1997, in order to reconcile E.O. 98 and E.O. 99, in paragraphs (a)(10) and (11), “AS 19” was substituted for “AS

28.05.011

” and “the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities” was added.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective July 11, 2014, in (a)(5), substituted “on a vehicle” for “upon a vehicle”, added (a)(12) and (a)(13), and made related changes.

Collateral references. —

7A Am. Jur. 2d, Automobiles and Highway Traffic, §§ 98, 99.

60 C.J.S., Motor Vehicles, §§ 353-378.

Sec. 28.10.060.
Vehicles registered elsewhere. [Repealed, § 7 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.10.061.
Registration of vehicles with altered or missing identification number.

When the vehicle identification number required to be registered under this chapter has been altered, removed, or defaced, or is not on the vehicle, the owner shall, immediately upon discovery, apply to the department for replacement of the identification number and for a new registration.
The department shall search all available sources to determine the identification number originally assigned and, if the number is determined, shall replace it. If efforts to determine the original identification number fail, the owner shall furnish information to show that the owner is entitled to ownership of the vehicle and have it inspected by the department. The department, when satisfied as to the ownership of the vehicle, shall assign an identification number to the vehicle and have the number placed upon the vehicle to which it is assigned. The vehicle shall then be registered under the replaced or assigned identification number.

History.

(§ 7 ch 178 SLA 1978)

Sec. 28.10.065.
Custom collector vehicle registration and identification.

When the department is satisfied as to the ownership of a replica of a custom collector vehicle and the vehicle does not have an identification number, the department shall assign a vehicle identification number to the vehicle and have the number stamped on the vehicle. A custom collector replica vehicle shall be registered as a vehicle constructed during the period represented by the replica.

History.

(§ 2 ch 8 SLA 1993)

Sec. 28.10.070.
Taxes. [Repealed, § 7 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.10.071.
Registration records and statistics; stolen vehicles.

The department shall review each application for registration received and, when satisfied that it is correct, register the vehicle and keep a record of the registration in suitable books, index cards, or electronic or photographic recording and storage media, or in any combination of them. The vehicles are referred to as “registered vehicles.” The department may compile a record of the number and types of vehicles registered in this state and may make statistical data available to the public for a fee as prescribed in regulations adopted by the commissioner. The department may also provide vehicle registration lists to the public for a fee as an electronic service or product under AS

40.25.115

. The commissioner may prescribe, by regulation, fees relating to the provision of vehicle registration lists.

Records under this section shall be maintained

by a distinctive registration number assigned to the vehicle;

by the vehicle identification number, including but not limited to a record of identification numbers replaced or assigned under AS

28.10.061

;

by the name and residence and mailing address of the owner; and

as otherwise required by the department.

The department shall keep a record of the registrations of vehicles used in law enforcement work when secrecy is necessary. This record is separate from the record required by (a) of this section and may be disclosed only to and upon the request of the chief peace officer of a municipality, a state trooper district commander, the chief federal law enforcement officer assigned to the state, or to a court upon an appropriate order.

The department shall maintain and appropriately index cumulative records of stolen, converted, recovered, and unclaimed vehicles reported to it. The department may make and distribute weekly lists of these vehicles to peace officers and to other departments upon their request without charge and to the public for a reasonable fee as prescribed by the department.

History.

(§ 7 ch 178 SLA 1978; am §§ 53, 54 ch 63 SLA 1993)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2000, “AS

40.25.115

” was substituted for “AS 09.25.115” to reflect the 2000 renumbering of AS 09.25.115.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 87, ch. 63, SLA 1993 provides “[i]f any section of this bill is found to violate the single subject rule it is severed from the rest of the bill.”

Sec. 28.10.080.
False statements. [Repealed, § 20 ch 241 SLA 1976.]

Sec. 28.10.081.
Issuance of certificate of registration; certificate to be signed, carried, and displayed.

The department shall mail or deliver the certificate of registration to the owner. The certificate of registration must contain the assigned registration number, the name, the residence and mailing addresses of the owner, the vehicle identification number, the fees paid, and as much of the vehicle description appearing on the title as the commissioner considers necessary.

Every certificate of registration shall, except when used to apply for renewal of registration or to transfer the registration, be carried in the vehicle to which it refers. The driver of a vehicle shall display the original certificate of registration or a legible photocopy if the original is on file at the address shown on the certificate of registration to a peace officer or an officer or employee of the department acting in an official capacity upon the request of that officer or employee.

History.

(§ 7 ch 178 SLA 1978)

Sec. 28.10.090.
New vehicles. [Repealed, § 7 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.10.091.
Lost or mutilated certificates of registration or registration plates.

If a certificate of registration or a registration plate is lost, stolen, mutilated, or becomes illegible, the owner or legal representative or successor in interest of the owner of the vehicle for which the certificate or plate was issued as shown by the records of the department shall, immediately upon discovering the fact, apply for a duplicate or substitute certificate of registration or registration plate and shall return to the department all parts of the original certificate of registration or registration plates that the applicant possesses.

History.

(§ 7 ch 178 SLA 1978)

Sec. 28.10.100.
Grounds for refusal. [Repealed, § 7 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Secs. 28.10.101 — 28.10.107.
Expiration of registration; staggered registration. [Repealed, § 37 ch 21 SLA 1985. For current law, see AS 28.10.108.]

Sec. 28.10.108.
Registration procedures.

Except for a vehicle registered under AS

28.10.152

or

28.10.155

, a vehicle required to be registered under this chapter shall be registered under the procedures set out in this section.

[Repealed, § 29 ch 6 FSSLA 1996.]

[Repealed, § 29 ch 6 FSSLA 1996.]

A registered vehicle retains the same biennial expiration date regardless of the ownership of the vehicle.

The registration of a vehicle expires on the last day of the month to which the vehicle is assigned.

Upon request of the owner and payment of the proportionate prorated applicable fees, a vehicle registered under this section shall have its registration period extended in monthly increments to allow biennial registration to occur in the month of the owner’s choice, except that registration may not extend beyond the expiration of an emissions inspection and maintenance certificate required for the vehicle. Notwithstanding the other provisions of this chapter, upon request of the owner, payment of the annual fee set out in AS

28.10.421(h)

, payment of any annual vehicle registration tax due under AS

28.10.431(l)

, and, if applicable, payment of one-half of the biennial emission control inspection program fee imposed under AS

28.10.423

, the department shall register a vehicle used for commercial purposes for a one-year period.

The department shall issue to the registered owner, upon receipt of the proper application and fees, registration plates, tabs, and registration form displaying the month and year in which the registration expires.

The department shall mail or deliver notice of registration expiration to the registered owner of record at the owner’s mailing address or electronic mail address as shown in the records of the department. An owner of a vehicle subject to registration who has received notice under this subsection may renew registration of the vehicle on the department’s Internet website or by returning the notice form, together with appropriate fees, to the department by mail postmarked not later than the fifth day of the registration renewal period shown on the vehicle’s current registration or notice form. Upon receipt of a timely registration renewal application and the appropriate fees and taxes, the department shall renew the registration and mail the current registration card and registration plates or tabs to the owner at the owner’s mailing address as shown in the department’s records.

If a vehicle is held for sale by a dealer, the requirement of registration and payment of fees and taxes does not apply until the vehicle is sold to a party other than another dealer. The exemption from payment of fees and taxes under this subsection applies only if

the dealer is registered with the state; and

the vehicle for which the exemption is sought can be shown to be part of the dealer’s inventory at the time of exemption.

The purchaser of a vehicle for which registration and taxes have been held in abeyance under (i) of this section shall register the vehicle within five working days of purchase and pay the prorated fees and taxes required by the department.

The department shall prorate fees in monthly increments to allow for registration of vehicles in more or less than one-year periods when required by any provision of this section.

Notwithstanding the other provisions of this section, the following vehicles are not required to be registered biennially and shall be registered one time only:

a vehicle qualifying for registration under AS

28.10.181(d)

; or

a vehicle owned by a person who is 65 years of age or older; this paragraph applies to only one vehicle owned by the person who is 65 years of age or older.

History.

(§ 38 ch 21 SLA 1985; am § 3 ch 20 SLA 1990; am § 29 ch 6 FSSLA 1996; am §§ 1 — 4 ch 44 SLA 1996; am § 1 ch 5 SLA 1997; am § 10 ch 48 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 128 SLA 1998; am § 2 ch 97 SLA 2003; am § 1 ch 45 SLA 2014; am § 1 ch 50 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsections (b) and (c) were repealed by § 29, ch. 6, FSSLA 1996 before amendments to those subsections made by §§ 1 and 2, ch. 44, SLA 1996 took effect.

Effect of amendments. —

The first 2014 amendment, effective July 1, 2014, in (h), in the first sentence, inserted “or deliver” following “shall mail”, and inserted “or electronic mail address” following “mailing address”, in the second sentence, inserted “on the department’s Internet website or” following “renew registration of the vehicle” and made stylistic changes, in the third sentence, deleted “postmarked” following “Upon receipt of a timely” and inserted “application” following “registration renewal”.

The second 2014 amendment, effective January 1, 2015, in (a), inserted “or

28.10.155

” following “under AS

28.10.155

”.

Sec. 28.10.110.
Registration card. [Repealed, § 7 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.10.111.
Renewal of registration.

Application for the renewal of vehicle registration shall be made by completing the proper form and paying any required fee and tax.

The department may receive an application for the renewal of vehicle registration and issue a new certificate of registration at any time before the expiration of the biennial registration as prescribed in regulations adopted by the commissioner. Nothing in this section prevents the commissioner from providing for a longer registration period; however, a person may not display the new registration plates on a vehicle before a date which may be set by the commissioner.

History.

(§ 7 ch 178 SLA 1978; am § 39 ch 21 SLA 1985; am § 5 ch 44 SLA 1996)

Collateral references. —

60 C.J.S., Motor Vehicles, § 241.

Sec. 28.10.120.
Plates. [Repealed, § 7 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.10.121.
Vehicles of nonresidents.

A nonresident owner of a noncommercial vehicle registered outside the state is exempt from the registration provisions of this chapter for 60 days after entry into the state if the vehicle at all times when driven in this state is registered in and has displayed upon it a currently valid registration plate issued for it by another jurisdiction. However, if the person becomes gainfully employed in the state or takes action that indicates an intention to acquire residence in the state, the person shall comply with the licensing and registration provisions of this chapter within 10 days of commencement of employment or of taking action that indicates the person’s intention to acquire residence. If the vehicle is a commercial vehicle, the vehicle must be registered when its commercial use begins except as provided in AS

28.10.011

,

28.10.131(c)

, and

28.10.152

.

A vehicle owned by a nonresident and of a type subject to registration under this chapter, that is leased or rented to a person having an established place of business, a residence, or employment in this state, is subject to registration under this chapter either by the owner or lessee.

A vehicle under (a) of this section that is owned and driven by a full-time student pursuing a course of study beyond the high school level and upon which current, valid registration by another jurisdiction is maintained need not be registered in this state unless the student establishes residence or accepts full-time employment in the state. This exemption applies only to the extent that the jurisdiction in which the vehicle is registered grants the same exemptions and privileges to a vehicle registered in this state.

It is the responsibility of the person claiming exemption under this section to provide proof of qualification for the exemption.

History.

(§ 7 ch 178 SLA 1978; am §§ 1, 2 ch 45 SLA 1987; am § 11 ch 48 SLA 1998)

Collateral references. —

7A Am. Jur. 2d, Automobiles and Highway Traffic, §§ 61, 111.

60 C.J.S., Motor Vehicles, §§ 190 to 192.

Corporation domiciled in state but having branch trucking bases in other states, applicability of motor vehicle registration laws to, 16 ALR2d 1414.

Secs. 28.10.125 — 28.10.130.
Historic vehicles, occasional users; plates.
[Repealed, § 7 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.10.131.
Vehicles previously registered in another jurisdiction.

Except for a vehicle to be registered under AS

28.10.152

, if a vehicle to be registered under this chapter is previously registered outside the state, the jurisdiction of registry shall be stated in the application, and the owner shall surrender to the department all evidence of out-of-state registration in the owner’s possession or control except as provided in this section, and the department may require verification of the vehicle identification number.

If the owner is unable to provide the necessary evidence of ownership, the department, when satisfied that the applicant is the lawfully registered owner of the vehicle, may register the vehicle without issuing a title and shall type or stamp on the face of the State of Alaska certificate of registration “No Title Issued.” The issuance of the Alaska certificate of title shall be withheld until the registered or legal owner provides for the surrender of the out-of-state title, or in the case of a nontitle state, documents that satisfy the department of ownership and any liens on the vehicle, or until the posting of a vehicle surety bond equal to the market value of the vehicle, which bond shall be maintained for two years.

Except as provided in AS

28.10.152

, if the owner of a commercial vehicle desires to maintain title in another jurisdiction, the department, when satisfied that the applicant is temporarily operating in-state and is the lawfully registered owner of the commercial vehicle, may register the commercial vehicle without issuing a title and shall type or stamp on the face of the State of Alaska certificate of registration “No Title Issued.”

History.

(§ 7 ch 178 SLA 1978; am §§ 3, 4 ch 45 SLA 1987; am §§ 12, 13 ch 48 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For registration, title, and transfer, see 2 AAC 92, art. 1.

Secs. 28.10.135,
28.10.140.
Reflective plates; attachment.
[Repealed, § 7 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.10.141.
Interstate use of vehicles. [Repealed, § 21, ch 48 SLA 1998.]

Sec. 28.10.146.
Registration of interstate rental trucks.

Notwithstanding any other registration requirement of this chapter, a fleet rental truck owner or authorized representative shall register a percentage of the total fleet as determined under this subsection, and shall pay the fees and taxes required by this chapter. The percentage of fleet rental trucks required to be registered is equal to the total number of miles that all trucks in the rental fleet were driven in this state during a calendar year or other period established by the department by regulation, divided by the total number of miles that all trucks in the rental fleet were driven in all states and the District of Columbia during that period.

When applying for registration under (a) of this section, the fleet rental owner or authorized representative shall file with the department a certified report containing verifiable data, reporting

the total number of miles operated by all of the trucks in the rental fleet in all states and the District of Columbia during the preceding calendar year or other period specified by the department;

the total number of miles operated in this state by all of the trucks in the rental fleet during the preceding calendar year or other period specified by the department; and

other fleet rental truck registration information that the department may require.

A fleet rental owner or authorized representative whose application for registration under this section has been accepted by the department shall preserve records of the period on which the application was based for four years. Upon request of the department, the fleet rental owner or authorized representative shall

provide records preserved under this subsection to the department for audit; or

pay the cost of an audit conducted by a representative of the department at the office of the owner.

After compliance with this section, all trucks identified as part of the rental fleet, and currently registered in any state or in the District of Columbia, may operate in this state.

If the department determines that the fleet rental owner or authorized representative has not registered fleet rental trucks as required by this section, the department may suspend or revoke a registration previously issued, and may deny future fleet rental registration under (a) of this section, until the owner or authorized representative has complied with this section. If registration under (a) of this section has been suspended, revoked, or denied, all the owner’s fleet rental trucks present in the state must be registered under applicable state law.

A fee or tax paid as a result of registration required under this section does not satisfy or offset other fees or taxes levied by the state or a political subdivision in connection with the ownership or operation of fleet rental trucks.

In this section, “fleet” means a fleet of 10 or more rental trucks that are rented or offered for rent without a driver.

History.

(§ 4 ch 20 SLA 1990)

Sec. 28.10.147.
Registration of interstate rental trailers.

Notwithstanding any other registration requirement of this chapter, a fleet rental trailer owner or authorized representative shall register the average number of trailers present in this state as calculated under this subsection, and shall pay the fees and taxes required by this chapter. The average number of trailers is equal to the total number of trailers in the fleet that were present at any time in the state during a calendar year or other period established by the department by regulation, divided by the number of calendar months in the period.

When applying for registration of trailers as required under (a) of this section, the fleet rental owner or authorized representative shall file with the department a certified report containing verifiable data as to the average number of trailers that were present at any time in the state for the previous calendar year or other period specified by the department.

A fleet rental owner or authorized representative whose application for registration under this section has been accepted by the department shall preserve records of the period on which the application was based for four years. Upon request of the department, the fleet rental owner or authorized representative shall

provide records preserved under this subsection, to the department at its office for audit; or

pay the cost of an audit conducted by a representative of the department at the office of the owner.

After compliance with this section, all trailers identified as part of the rental fleet, and currently registered in any state or in the District of Columbia, may operate in this state.

If the department determines that the fleet rental owner or authorized representative has not registered fleet rental trailers as required by this section, the department may suspend or revoke a registration previously issued, and may deny future registration under (a) of this section, until the owner has complied with this section. If registration under (a) of this section has been suspended, revoked, or denied, all the owner’s fleet rental trailers present in the state must be registered under applicable state law.

A fee or tax paid as a result of registration required under this section does not satisfy or offset other fees or taxes levied by the state or a political subdivision in connection with the ownership or operation of fleet rental trailers.

In this section, “fleet” means a fleet of 10 or more rental trailers that are rented or offered for rent for personal use, not for the transportation of persons or property for hire or other commercial use, and includes a boat trailer, baggage trailer, box trailer, utility trailer, house trailer, or travel trailer.

History.

(§ 4 ch 20 SLA 1990)

Sec. 28.10.150.
Duplicates. [Repealed, § 7 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.10.151.
Vehicles transported under special permits.

When moved or driven under a special permit to be designed and issued by the department, the registration required by this chapter is not required of

a vehicle under construction and that is not completed;

a vehicle while being moved from one place to another for the purpose of inspection, weighing, or meeting other requirements of the department;

a vehicle while being moved or driven from one location to another for the purpose of rebuilding, dismantling, or permanently removing the vehicle from the highways and vehicular ways and areas of the state; or

an unladen commercial vehicle making a single continuous trip by a noncircular route for a period of time not exceeding 10 days.

A special permit issued under this section shall be prominently displayed.

History.

(§ 7 ch 178 SLA 1978; am §§ 6, 7 ch 45 SLA 1987)

Administrative Code. —

For registration, title, and transfer, see 2 AAC 92, art. 1.

Sec. 28.10.152.
Certificates of temporary registration for certain commercial vehicles.

If a commercial vehicle registered outside the state enters the state and is not to be registered under AS

28.10.121

,

28.10.131

, or another provision of this chapter, it must be temporarily registered under the provisions of this section.

For a commercial vehicle to be registered under this section, the operator of the vehicle must provide proof of valid registration of the vehicle in another jurisdiction and any other documentation required by the department by regulation. Upon receipt of the proof of registration, any other required documentation, and payment of the applicable fee under (d) of this section, the department or the department’s designee may issue a certificate of temporary registration, valid for 30 days, for the commercial vehicle. The certificate of temporary registration must state the date of issuance and the expiration date.

A certificate of temporary registration under this section may be issued for a commercial vehicle even if a certificate of temporary registration has previously been issued for the vehicle and has expired.

The fee for a certificate of temporary registration under this section is

for a truck or a truck tractor, $350;

for a commercial bus, $350;

for all other commercial vehicles, including a trailer or a semi-trailer, $10.

Fees collected under this section may be appropriated by the legislature to the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities for programs related to commercial vehicles, including the administration and operation of weigh stations and commercial vehicle safety programs.

History.

(§ 14 ch 48 SLA 1998)

Sec. 28.10.155.
Permanent motor vehicle registration.

The owner of a motor vehicle, other than a commercial motor vehicle, that is required to be registered under this chapter may elect to register the motor vehicle permanently in lieu of registration under AS

28.10.108

if the vehicle is at least eight years old and the owner resides in the unorganized borough or in a municipality that elects, by passage of an appropriate ordinance, to allow the permanent registration of motor vehicles. The permanent registration expires when the owner transfers or assigns the owner’s title or interest in the vehicle. A permanent registration may not be renewed. On receiving the proper application and fees, the department shall issue to the registered owner registration plates, tabs, and a permanent registration form.

The fees for permanent registration must equal the fees that would be applicable if the motor vehicle were registered under AS

28.10.108

, plus a permanent registration fee of $25. The motor vehicle registration tax for a permanently registered vehicle is the rate established for permanent motor vehicle registration under AS

28.10.431(j)

. If a municipality has not established a tax for a permanently registered motor vehicle, the biennial rate established in AS

28.10.431(b)

or (j), if any, is levied upon the vehicle and is payable only once at the time a motor vehicle is permanently registered. Except as provided in AS

28.10.423(b)

, the owner of a permanently registered motor vehicle is not required to pay other registration fees or taxes under this chapter.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2014)

Effective dates. —

Section 9, ch. 50, SLA 2014 made this section effective January 1, 2015.

Sec. 28.10.160.
Transfers. [Repealed, § 7 ch 178 SLA 1978.]